Vermont, session 2025-2026, H355.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Vermont Defend the Guard Act”.
Sec. 2. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Under Article I, Section 8 of the U.S. Constitution, Congress
possesses the express authority to declare war, ensuring a system of checks and
balances.
VT LEG #381038 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.355
2025 Page 2 of 4
(2) The Vermont National Guard plays a unique dual role, serving both
the State and federal functions, with State authority during peace time retained
under Title 32 of the United States Code.
(3) The federal government has increasingly circumvented
Congressional authority, engaging the National Guard units in combat
operations without formal Congressional declaration of war, undermining
constitutional principles.
(4) Vermont retains authority over its militia as a safeguard against
federal overreach, consistent with the 10th Amendment to the U.S.
Constitution.
(5) This act seeks to ensure Vermont’s Guard members are deployed in
accordance with constitutional requirements, preserving their safety and the
integrity of the law.
Sec. 3. 20 V.S.A. chapter 21 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 21. GENERAL PROVISIONS
* * *
§ 370. REVIEW OF FEDERAL ORDERS; AUTHORITY
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active duty combat” means performing the following services
under federal active duty:
(A) participation in an armed conflict;
VT LEG #381038 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.355
2025 Page 3 of 4
(B) performance of hazardous services relating to an armed conflict
in a foreign state; and
(C) duties performed using instruments of war.
(2) “Official declaration of war” means a formal declaration of war
issued pursuant to Article I, Section 8 of the U.S. Constitution.
§ 371. REVIEW OF FEDERAL ORDERS; AUTHORITY
(a) The Governor shall not release the Vermont National Guard into active
duty combat unless the U.S. Congress has passed an official declaration of war
or has explicitly called forth the Vermont National Guard pursuant to Article I,
Section 8, Clause 15 of the U.S. Constitution for one of the following
purposes:
(1) repelling a military invasion of the United States;
(2) suppressing an insurrection; or
(3) executing the laws of the United States, provided that the laws were
enacted consistent with the provisions of the U.S. Constitution.
(b) The Governor shall review all orders that place any unit of the Vermont
National Guard on federal active duty status to determine if it is consistent with
the requirements of subsection (a) of this section. If the Governor determines
that the order is not consistent with the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section, the Governor shall take all necessary and appropriate actions to
prevent the Vermont National Guard from being placed on federal active duty.
VT LEG #381038 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.355
2025 Page 4 of 4
(c) Within 10 business days after completing a review pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, the Governor shall notify the General Assembly
of the receipt of the federal deployment directive and the Governor’s
determination. The report shall summarize the federal directive and its scope
and shall explain the Governor’s review process for determining the directive’s
legality and constitutionality.
(d) This section shall not be construed to:
(1) prohibit the Governor from consenting to deployment of the
Vermont National Guard for domestic missions under Title 32 of the United
States Code, including disaster response and homeland security; or
(2) limit the authority of the Vermont National Guard to engage in
training missions or humanitarian deployments outside the United States.
Sec. 4. IMPLEMENTATION AND COMPLIANCE
The Governor shall take all necessary steps to ensure compliance with this
act, including rejecting federal orders for deployment into active duty combat
unless the criteria established in this act are met. Any order conflicting with
this act shall be deemed invalid and unenforceable under Vermont law.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381038 v.1